tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Eskrim > Eskrim Puanlama Ekipmanları: Eskrim zemin kabloları; Eskrim makaraları; Eskrim skor göstergeleri; Eskrim skor makineleri; Eskrim priz ve fişleri; Eskrim test ekipmanları
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Schermen > Schermscoreapparatuur: Vloerkabels voor schermen; Schermhaspels; Displays op afstand voor schermen; Score-apparaten voor schermen; Aansluitingen en stekkers voor schermen; Testapparatuur voor schermen
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Fekting > Scoreutstyr for fekting: Gulvkabler for fekting; Kabeltromler for fekting; Fjerndisplayer for fekting; Poengmaskiner for fekting; Kontakter og plugger for fekting; Testutstyr for fekting
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Scherma > Attrezzatura per il punteggio della scherma: Cavi da pedana da scherma; Rulli da scherma; Display remoti da scherma; Apparecchi segnastoccate da scherma; Prese e spine da scherma; Apparecchi di collaudo per scherma
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 펜싱 > 펜싱 점수 장비: 펜싱 플로어 코드; 펜싱 릴; 펜싱 원격 디스플레이; 펜싱 스코어링 머신; 펜싱 소켓 및 플러그; 펜싱 테스트 장비
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Fencing > Fencing Scoring Equipment: Fencing Floor Cords; Fencing Reels; Fencing Remote Displays; Fencing Scoring Machines; Fencing Sockets & Plugs; Fencing Test Equipment
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Đấu kiếm hiện đại > Thiết bị ghi tỉ số đấu kiếm: Dây điện sàn đấu kiếm; Cuộn cáp đấu kiếm; Màn hình hiển thị từ xa đấu kiếm; Máy chấm điểm đấu kiếm; Giắc cắm và ổ cắm đấu kiếm; Thiết bị kiểm tra đấu kiếm
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Mačevanje > Oprema za bodovanje u mačevanju: Podni kabeli za mačevanje; Kotač za namatanje žice za mačevanje; Udaljeni zasloni za mačevanje; Strojevi za bodovanje za mačevanje; Utičnice i utikači za mačevanje; Oprema za testiranje za mačevanje
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Miekkailu > Miekkailun pisteytyslaitteet: Miekkailun lattiakaapelit; Miekkailukelat; Miekkailun etänäytöt; Miekkailun tuloskoneet; Miekkailun pistorasiat ja pistokkeet; Miekkailun testauslaitteet
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Фехтовка > Оборудване за отбелязване на точки по фехтовка: Подови кабели за фехтовка; Макари за фехтовка; Дистанционни дисплеи за фехтовка; Уреди за отчитане на точки; Контакти и щепсели за фехтовално оборудване; Тестово оборудване за фехтовка
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Szermierka > Sprzęt do punktacji w szermierce: Przewody podłogowe do szermierki; Bębny szermiercze; Wyświetlacze zdalne do szermierki; Aparaty sędziowskie do szermierki; Gniazda i wtyczki szermiercze; Sprzęt testowy do szermierki
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Ξιφασκία > Εξοπλισμός βαθμολόγησης ξιφασκίας: Καλώδια δαπέδου ξιφασκίας; Μηχανισμοί καλωδίων ξιφασκίας (reels); Απομακρυσμένες οθόνες ξιφασκίας; Μηχανήματα καταγραφής πόντων ξιφασκίας; Υποδοχές και βύσματα ξιφασκίας; Εξοπλισμός δοκιμών ξιφασκίας
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Vívás > Vívás-pontozófelszerelés: Vívó padlókábelek; Vívó kábeldobok; Vívó távkijelzők; Vívó találatjelző gépek; Vívó aljzatok és dugók; Vívó tesztelő berendezések
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Fäktning > Poängutrustning för fäktning: Golvkablar för fäktning; Kabelvindor för fäktning; Fjärrskärmar för fäktning; Poängmaskiner för fäktning; Kontakter och pluggar för fäktning; Testutrustning för fäktning
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フェンシング用品 > フェンシング採点装置: フェンシング用フロアコード; フェンシング用リール; フェンシング用リモートディスプレイ; フェンシング用スコアマシン; フェンシング用ソケット・プラグ; フェンシング用テスト機器
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Esgrima > Equipamento de pontuação para esgrima: Cabos de chão de esgrima; Enroladores de esgrima; Ecrãs remotos de esgrima; Máquinas de pontuação de esgrima; Tomadas e fichas de esgrima; Equipamento de teste de esgrima
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Fægtning > Fægtescoreudstyr: Gulvkabler til fægtning; Fægtespoler; Eksterne skærme til fægtning; Pointmaskiner til fægtning; Fægtestik og -kontakter; Testudstyr til fægtning
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Scrimă > Echipamente scor scrimă: Cabluri de podea pentru scrimă; Role de cablu pentru scrimă; Afișaje la distanță pentru scrimă; Aparate de arbitraj electronic pentru scrimă; Prize și fișe pentru scrimă; Echipamente de testare pentru scrimă
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Escrime > Équipement de notation d'escrime: Fils de piste d'escrime; Enrouleurs d'escrime; Répétiteurs d'escrime; Appareils de signalisation d'escrime; Prises et fiches d'escrime; Équipement de test d'escrime
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > การฟันดาบ > อุปกรณ์นับคะแนนฟันดาบ: สายไฟพื้นฟันดาบ; รอกสายไฟฟันดาบ; จอแสดงผลคะแนนฟันดาบระยะไกล; เครื่องนับคะแนนฟันดาบ; ซ็อกเก็ตและปลั๊กฟันดาบ; อุปกรณ์ทดสอบระบบฟันดาบ
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Фехтование > Оборудование для подсчета очков в фехтовании: Напольные шнуры для фехтования; Катушки-рулетки для фехтования; Выносные дисплеи для фехтования; Электрофиксаторы для фехтования; Розетки и штекеры для фехтования; Оборудование для тестирования (фехтование)
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 击剑 > 击剑记分设备: 击剑地线; 击剑收线盘; 击剑远程显示屏; 击剑计分机; 击剑插座与插头; 击剑测试设备
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Sabljanje > Oprema za ocenjevanje sabljanja: Sabljanje Talni kabli; Vretena za sabljanje; Oddaljeni zasloni za sabljanje; Stroji za točkovanje za sabljanje; Sabljanje Vtičnice in vtiči; Oprema za testiranje za sabljanje
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 擊劍 > 擊劍記分設備: 擊劍地線; 擊劍捲線器; 擊劍遠端顯示器; 擊劍計分機; 擊劍插座與插頭; 擊劍測試設備
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Esgrima > Equipo de puntuación de esgrima: Cables de piso para esgrima; Enrolladores de esgrima; Pantallas remotas para esgrima; Máquinas de puntuación para esgrima; Enchufes y conectores para esgrima; Equipo de prueba para esgrima
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Fechtavimas > Fechtavimo taškų skaičiavimo įranga: Fechtavimo grindų kabeliai; Fechtavimo ritės; Fechtavimo nuotoliniai ekranai; Fechtavimo taškų skaičiavimo įranga; Fechtavimo lizdai ir kištukai; Fechtavimo testavimo įranga
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Šerm > Šermířské bodovací vybavení: Šermířské podlahové kabely; Šermířské navijáky; Šermířské dálkové displeje; Šermířské signalizační přístroje; Šermířské zásuvky a zástrčky; Šermířská testovací zařízení
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Šerm > Vybavenie na hodnotenie šermu: Podlahové káble pre šerm; Šermiarske navijaky; Displeje pre šerm; Bodovacie stroje na šerm; Zásuvky a zástrčky pre šerm; Šermiarske testovacie zariadenia
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Esgrima > Equipamento de pontuação para esgrima: Cabos de pista de esgrima; Enroladores de esgrima; Visores remotos de esgrima; Máquinas de pontuação de esgrima; Conectores e plugues de esgrima; Equipamentos de teste de esgrima
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Fechten > Fechtmelder: Fecht-Bodenkabel; Fecht-Kabelrollen; Remote-Displays für Fechten; Fecht-Trefferanzeigen; Fecht-Buchsen & Stecker; Fecht-Prüfgeräte